Utah statutes.
62A-3-103.   Director of division -- Appointment -- Qualifications.
(1)  The director of the division shall be appointed by the executive director
with the concurrence of the board.
(2)  The director shall have a bachelor's degree from an accredited university
or college, be experienced in administration, and be knowledgeable in matters
concerning the aging and adult populations.
(3)  The director is the administrative head of the division.
